Hawaii statutes.
§11-140 Spoiled ballots. In elections
using the paper ballot and electronic voting systems, if a voter spoils a
ballot, the voter may obtain another upon returning the spoiled one. Before
returning the spoiled ballot, the voter shall conform to the procedure
promulgated by the chief election officer to retain the secrecy of the vote. [L
1970, c 26, pt of §2; am L 1973, c 217, §1(uu); am L 1975, c 36, §1(11); am L
1980, c 264, §1(o); am L 1981, c 100, §1(3)]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next